Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

General Provisions

65-10-101. Lien of contractors.

Where any railroad company contracts with any person for the grading of its roadway, the construction or repair of its culverts, bridges, and masonry, the furnishing of cross-ties, the laying of its track, the erection of its depots, platforms, wood or water stations, section houses, machine shops, or other buildings, or for the delivery of material for any of these purposes, or for engineering or superintendence, there shall be a lien upon such railroad, its franchise and property, in favor of the person with whom the railroad company contracts for the performance of the work or the delivery of the materials, to the amount of the debt contracted for such performance or delivery.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 1; Shan., § 3570; mod. Code 1932, § 7992; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1001.

Cross-References. Lien of subcontractors, laborers, materialmen and other persons, title 65, ch. 10, part 2.

Priority of liens, § 65-10-206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 55.

65-10-102. Duration of contractors' lien.

The lien shall continue in force for six (6) months after the performance of the work or the delivery of the material, and until the termination of any suit commenced within the time for its enforcement.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 1; Shan., § 3571; Code 1932, § 7993; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1002.

65-10-103. Enforcement of contractors' lien.

This lien may be enforced by a suit against the railroad company in the circuit or chancery court of the county where the work, or some part thereof, was done, or the material, or some part thereof, was delivered.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 2; Shan., § 3572; mod. Code 1932, § 7994; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1003.

Cross-References. Priority of liens, § 65-10-206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 59.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241 (1978).

65-10-104. Pleadings.

The pleading of the plaintiff or complainant shall set out, with reasonable certainty, the work done or the materials furnished, the amount of indebtedness claimed therefor, and the nature and the substance of the contract, and such suit shall be docketed and conducted as other suits in the court.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 2; Shan., § 3573; mod. Code 1932, § 7995; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1004.

65-10-105. Lien of subcontractors against contractor.

When any principal contractor, by which is meant one who contracts directly with the railroad companies, shall refuse to pay any subcontractor, mechanic, laborer, or other person employed by the principal contractor for the performance of any of such work or the delivery of materials for the purposes provided for in § 65-10-101, such subcontractor, mechanic, laborer, or other person so employed by the principal contractor may elect to give notice, in writing, to the railroad company, setting out the work done or material furnished, and the amount claimed therefor, and, thereupon, the amount that may be due or owing from the railroad company to the principal contractor, not exceeding the sum claimed, shall be bound and liable, in the hands of the railroad company, for the payment of the amount so claimed, and shall constitute a first lien in favor of the claimant, superior to all other liens upon the company's railroad, and shall continue in force for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of service of such notice, and until the termination of any suit commenced within that time to enforce it.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 3; Shan., § 3574; mod. Code 1932, § 7996; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1005.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 59.

65-10-106. Payment into court by railroad.

If, after notice provided for in § 65-10-105, the principal contractor shall bring suit against the railroad company, the latter may relieve itself by paying into court the amount so claimed, and the person giving such notice shall be summoned to contest the matter with the principal contractor, and such judgment be rendered thereon as the right may appear.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 3; Shan., § 3575; Code 1932, § 7997; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1006.

65-10-107. Enforcement of lien against contractor.

The claim provided for in § 65-10-105 may be enforced against the railroad company, as garnishee, and the principal contractor, as debtor, in such court or before any judge of the court of general sessions of the county having jurisdiction of the amount claimed.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 3; Shan., § 3576; mod. Code 1932, § 7998; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1007.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 59.

65-10-108. Lien of laborer or materialman against subcontractor.

If any subcontractor refuses to pay any mechanic, laborer, or other person employed by such contractor, for the performance of any of the work, or the delivery of material for the purposes provided for in § 65-10-101, such mechanic, laborer, or other person so employed by the subcontractor may elect to give notice, in writing, to the principal contractor, setting out the work done or the material furnished, and the amount claimed therefor; and thereupon the amount that may be due or owing from the principal contractor to the subcontractor, not exceeding the amount of the claim, shall be bound and liable in the hands of the principal contractor, for the amount so claimed, for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of the service of notice upon the principal contractor, or the principal contractor's agent or attorney, and until the termination of any suit commenced within that time for the collection of such claim.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 4; Shan., § 3577; mod. Code 1932, § 7999; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1008.

Cross-References. Lien of subcontractors, laborers, materialmen and other persons, title 65, ch. 10, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Liens — Priority of Conditional Vendor's Lien Over Warehousemen's Lien, 8 Tenn. L. Rev. 202 (1930).

65-10-109. Enforcement of lien against subcontractor.

The notice provided for in § 65-10-105 shall operate as a first lien in favor of the claimant upon the amount that may be due from the principal contractor to the subcontractor, and may be enforced against the principal contractor as garnishee and the subcontractor as debtor.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 4; Shan., § 3578; mod. Code 1932, § 8000; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1009.

65-10-110. Payment into court by principal contractor.

The principal contractor may, upon receiving the notice provided for in § 65-10-105, be relieved, if sued, by paying the sum claimed into court, which payment into court shall discharge the principal contractor from liability to the subcontractor for the amount so paid into court; and thereupon the subcontractor shall be summoned to answer the demand of the claimant, and such judgment shall be rendered thereon as the right may appear.

Acts 1883, ch. 220, § 4; Shan., § 3579; Code 1932, § 8001; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1010.

65-10-111. Equipment and rolling stock.

In any written contract of or for the sale of the railroad equipment or rolling stock, deliverable immediately or subsequently at stipulated periods, by the terms of which the purchase money, in whole or in part, is to be paid in the future, it may be agreed that the title to the property so sold or contracted to be sold shall not pass to or vest in the vendee until the purchase money shall have been fully paid, or that the vendor shall have and retain a lien thereon for the unpaid purchase money, notwithstanding delivery thereof to and possession by the vendee; provided, that the terms of credit for the payment of the purchase money shall not exceed fifteen (15) years from the execution of the contract.

In any written contract for the leasing or renting of railroad equipment or rolling stock, it is lawful to stipulate for a conditional sale thereof at the termination of such lease, and to stipulate that the rentals received may, as paid or when paid in full, be applied and treated as purchase money, and that the title of such property shall not vest in such lessee or vendee until the purchase money shall have been paid in full, notwithstanding delivery to and possession by such lessee or vendee, subject, however, to the proviso contained in subsection (a).

Every such contract specified in this section shall be good, valid, and effectual, both in law and equity, against all purchasers and creditors; provided, first, the same shall be acknowledged by the vendee or lessee before some officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds in the form required as to conveyance of real estate; second, such instrument shall be registered in the office of the register of the county in which, at the time of the execution thereof, is situated the principal office of the vendee or lessee in this state; and third, each locomotive engine or car so sold or contracted to be sold or leased as aforementioned shall have the name of the vendor or lessor, or the assignee of such vendor or lessor, plainly placed or marked on each side thereof, or be otherwise marked so as to indicate the ownership thereof.

Acts 1885, ch. 96, §§ 1-3, 5; 1903, ch. 199, § 1; Shan., §§ 3587-3589; Code 1932, §§ 8009-8011; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1018 — 65-1020; Acts 1991, ch. 360, § 1.

65-10-112. Priority of judgments for timbers, work, or damages.

No railroad company shall have power to give or create any mortgage or other kind of lien on its railway property in this state, which shall be valid and binding against judgments and decrees, and executions therefrom, for timbers furnished and work and labor done on, or for damages done to persons and property in the operation of its railroad in this state.

Acts 1877, ch. 12, § 3; 1877, ch. 72, § 3; Shan., § 1530; Code 1932, § 2587; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1021.

Cross-References. Liability for timber cut, § 29-36-102.

Liability of railroad to taxation, § 65-8-108.

Lien of state for construction of underpass or overpass, priority, § 65-11-109.

Priority of liens of contractors, subcontractors, laborers and materialmen, § 65-10-206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 54.

65-10-113. Lessee holds subject to burdens against lessor.

The lessee of any railroad shall hold such road subject to the liens and liabilities to which it was subject in the hands of the lessor, and be bound for all payments for which the lessor was liable.

Code 1858, § 1123 (deriv. Acts 1857-1858, ch. 8, § 3); Shan., § 1539; Code 1932, § 2609; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1022.